Louisiana, session 2026, HB207.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:3111(B) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§3111. Board creation; qualification; domicile; term of office; confirmation; oath
of office; compensation
* * *
B. The board shall be composed of seven persons, five of whom shall be
auctioneers,; one selected from each public service commission district, and two of
whom shall be consumers from the public at large, and all appointed by the governor.
The auctioneer members shall be appointed from a list, provided by the board, of
current, licensed auctioneers in good standing and shall have been a licensee for no
less than five consecutive years. Each appointee shall be a citizen of the United
States of America, a resident of Louisiana this state, and at least thirty years of age.
The governor shall designate one member of the board to serve as chairman. The
board shall elect a vice chairman annually by majority vote of the total membership
of the board.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 207 ENROLLED
C. The board shall be domiciled in East Baton Rouge, but shall be authorized
to meet elsewhere in the state Parish where the board shall be sued.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of R.S. 37:3111(B) as enacted by this Act shall apply only
to board members appointed on or after the effective date of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.